Nebraska, session 109, LB610.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB610 LB610
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 68-982, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
68-982 (1) An eligible provider's supplemental reimbursement
pursuant to the Ground Emergency Medical Transport Act shall be
calculated and paid as follows:
(a) The supplemental reimbursement shall equal the amount of federal
financial participation received as a result of the claims submitted
pursuant to the act; and
(b) In no instance may the amount certified pursuant to section
68-985, when combined with the amount received from all other sources of
reimbursement from the medical assistance program, exceed one hundred
percent of actual costs, as determined pursuant to the medicaid state
plan, for ground emergency medical transport services.
(2) The supplemental reimbursement shall be distributed exclusively
to eligible providers under a payment method based on ground emergency
medical transport services provided to medicaid beneficiaries by eligible
providers on the a per-transport basis of actual and allowable costs that
are or other federally permissible basis.
Sec. 2. Section 68-985, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
68-985 If a governmental entity elects to seek supplemental
reimbursement pursuant to the Ground Emergency Medical Transport Act on
behalf of an eligible provider owned or operated by the entity, the
governmental entity shall:
(1) Certify, in conformity with the requirements of 42 C.F.R.
433.51, as such regulation existed on January 1, 2025, including any
other applicable federal requirements, that the claimed expenditures for
ground emergency medical transport services are eligible for federal
financial participation;
(2) Provide evidence supporting the certification as specified by
the department;
-2-

LB610 LB610
2025 2025
(3) Submit data as specified by the department to determine the
appropriate amounts to claim as expenditures qualifying for federal
financial participation; and
(4) Keep, maintain, and have readily retrievable any records
specified by the department to fully disclose reimbursement amounts to
which the eligible provider is entitled and any other records required by
the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.
Sec. 3. Section 68-986, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
68-986 (1) On or before January 1, 2026 2018, the department shall
seek any necessary federal approvals for the implementation of submit an
application to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services of the
United States Department of Health and Human Services amending the
medicaid state plan to provide for the supplemental reimbursement rate
for ground emergency medical transport services as specified in the
Ground Emergency Medical Transport Act.
(2) The department may limit the program to those costs that are
allowable expenditures under Title XIX of the federal Social Security
Act, 42 U.S.C. 1396 et seq., as such act and sections existed on January
1, 2025 April 1, 2017. Without such federal approval, the Ground
Emergency Medical Transport Act may not be implemented.
(3) The intergovernmental transfer program authorized in section
68-983 shall be implemented only if and to the extent federal financial
participation is available and is not otherwise jeopardized and any
necessary federal approval has been obtained.
(4) To the extent that the chief executive officer of the department
determines that the payments made pursuant to section 68-983 do not
comply with federal medicaid requirements, the chief executive officer
may return or not accept an intergovernmental transfer and may adjust
payments as necessary to comply with federal medicaid requirements.
Sec. 4. Section 68-987, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
-3-

LB610 LB610
2025 2025
amended to read:
68-987 (1) The department shall submit claims for federal financial
participation for the expenditures for the services described in
subsection (2) of section 68-986 that are allowable expenditures under
federal law.
(2) The department shall annually submit any necessary materials to
the federal government to provide assurances that claims for federal
financial participation will include only those expenditures that are
allowable under federal law.
(3) If either a final judicial determination is made by any court of
appellate jurisdiction or a final determination is made by the
administrator of the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services
that the supplemental reimbursement provided for in the Ground Emergency
Medical Transport Act act shall be made to any provider not described in
this section, the chief executive officer of the department shall execute
a declaration stating that the determination has been made and such
supplemental reimbursement becomes inoperative on the date of such
determination.
Sec. 5. Section 68-988, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
68-988 To the extent federal approval is obtained, the increased
capitation payments under section 68-983 may commence for dates of
service on or after January 1, 2025 2018.
Sec. 6. Original sections 68-982, 68-985, 68-986, 68-987, and
68-988, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-4-